Wisconsin, session 2025, AB617.
do enact as follows:AB617,11Section 1. 5.05 (12) of the statutes is amended to read:AB617,2,725.05 (12) Voter education. The commission may conduct or prescribe 3requirements for educational programs to inform electors about voting procedures, 4voting rights, and voting technology. The commission shall conduct an educational 5program for the purpose of educating electors who cast paper ballots, ballots that 6are counted at a central counting location, and absentee ballots of the effect of 7casting excess votes for a single office.AB617,28Section 2. 5.057 of the statutes is created to read:AB617,3,495.057 Determination of ineligibility to vote due to incompetency. (1) 10Upon receipt of a determination of ineligibility to register to vote or to vote under s. 1154.25 (2) (c) 1. g., the commission shall, no later than 3 business days after receiving 12the determination, change the status of the elector subject to the determination to 13inactive on the official registration list under s. 6.36, note on the list that the elector 14is ineligible to register to vote or to vote in accordance with s. 6.03 (3), and notify the 15elector and the elector’s municipal clerk of the elector’s change in status. If the 16commission does not have a record of the elector upon receipt of a determination of 17ineligibility, the commission shall create a record listing the elector as ineligible to 18vote in accordance with s. 6.03 (3) and provide a copy of that record to the elector’s 19municipal clerk. Upon receipt of a registration to vote, the municipal clerk shall 1examine the registration list to determine whether the elector is ineligible to 2register to vote or to vote in accordance with s. 6.03 (3) and shall notify the elector if 3the clerk determines that the elector is ineligible. The clerk shall examine the 4registration list before issuing a ballot to any elector.AB617,3,125(2) If under s. 54.64 (2) (a) a court subsequently reviews a determination of 6ineligibility to vote under s. 54.25 (2) (c) 1. g. and restores an elector’s right to vote, 7as provided under s. 54.64 (2) (c), upon receipt of the reviewing court’s 8determination, the commission shall, no later than 3 business days after receiving 9the determination, notify the elector that the elector is eligible to vote, but that the 10elector is required to complete a new voter registration if the elector intends to vote. 11The commission shall submit with the notice a registration form for the elector to 12complete and return to the municipal clerk, if the elector intends to vote.AB617,313Section 3. 5.84 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB617,4,11145.84 (1) Where any municipality employs an electronic voting system which 15that utilizes automatic tabulating equipment, either at the polling place or at a 16central counting location, the municipal clerk shall, on any day not more than 10 15 17days prior to the election day on which the equipment is to be utilized in an election, 18have the equipment tested to ascertain that it will correctly count the votes cast for 19all offices and on all measures. Public notice of the time and place of the test shall 20be given by the clerk at least 48 hours prior to the test by posting notice on the 21municipality’s website if it has one or, if the municipality has no website, by 22publication of a class 1 notice under ch. 985 in one or more newspapers published 23within the municipality if a newspaper is published therein, otherwise in a 1newspaper of general circulation therein. The test shall be open to the public. The 2test shall be conducted by processing a preaudited group of ballots so marked as to 3record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each 4referendum. The test shall include for each office one or more ballots which have 5votes in excess of the number allowed by law and, for a partisan primary election, 6one or more ballots which have votes cast for candidates of more than one 7recognized political party, in order to test the ability of the automatic tabulating 8equipment to reject such votes. If any error is detected, the municipal clerk shall 9ascertain the cause and correct the error. The clerk shall make an errorless count 10before the automatic tabulating equipment is approved by the clerk for use in the 11election.AB617,412Section 4. 5.84 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB617,4,18135.84 (2) Before beginning the ballot count at each polling place or at the 14central counting location, the election officials shall witness a test of the automatic 15tabulating equipment by engaging the printing mechanism and securing a printed 16result showing a zero count for every candidate and referendum. After the 17completion of the count, the ballots and programs used shall be sealed and retained 18under the custody of the municipal clerk in a secure location.AB617,519Section 5. 5.85 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB617,5,9205.85 (1) At any polling place at which an electronic voting system is utilized, 21the following procedures for receiving, counting, tallying, and return of the ballots 22shall be used. Whenever paper ballots are utilized at a polling place in combination 23with ballots employed in an electronic voting system, the paper ballots shall be 1deposited in a separate ballot box or boxes, according to the types of ballots used. 2For the purpose of transporting the ballots or the record of the votes cast, the 3municipal clerk shall provide a secure container for each polling place. At each 4polling place, the applicable portions of the procedure prescribed for initiating the 5canvass under s. 7.51 (1) and (2) shall be performed, except that no count of the 6ballots, except write-in votes and paper ballots used for absentee voting and other 7purposes authorized by law, may be performed at a polling place if a central 8counting location is designated for the counting of ballots at that polling place by 9the municipality.AB617,610Section 6. 5.85 (5) of the statutes is repealed.AB617,711Section 7. 5.86 of the statutes is repealed.AB617,812Section 8. 5.87 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB617,5,21135.87 (1) If a central counting location is not utilized, the The procedure for 14tabulating the votes by the automatic tabulating equipment shall be under the 15direction of the chief inspector and shall conform to the requirements of the 16automatic tabulating equipment. If any ballot is not accepted by the automatic 17tabulating equipment, the election officials shall make a duplicate ballot to replace 18that ballot in the manner prescribed in s. 5.85 (3). All proceedings at the polling 19place and at any central counting location shall be open to the public, but no person, 20except those employed and authorized for the purpose, may touch any ballot, 21container, envelope, return, or equipment.AB617,922Section 9. 5.91 (17) of the statutes is amended to read:AB617,6,4235.91 (17) Unless the ballot is counted at a central counting location, it It 1includes a mechanism for notifying an elector who attempts to cast an excess 2number of votes for a single office that his or her votes for that office will not be 3counted, and provides the elector with an opportunity to correct his or her ballot or 4to receive and cast a replacement ballot.AB617,105Section 10. 6.18 (form) of the statutes is amended to read:AB617,6,1066.18 (form) This form shall be returned to the municipal clerk’s office. 7Application must be received in sufficient time for ballots to be mailed and returned 8prior to any no later than 5 p.m. on the 7th day immediately preceding the 9presidential election at which applicant wishes to vote. Complete all statements in 10full.AB617,6,1111APPLICATION FOR PRESIDENTIALAB617,6,1212ELECTOR’S ABSENTEE BALLOTAB617,6,1313(To be voted at the Presidential ElectionAB617,6,1414on November ...., .... (year)AB617,6,2315I, .... hereby swear or affirm that I am a citizen of the United States, formerly 16residing at .... in the .... ward .... aldermanic district (city, town, village) of ...., 17County of .... for 28 consecutive days prior to leaving the State of Wisconsin. I, .... do 18solemnly swear or affirm that I do not qualify to register or vote under the laws of 19the State of ....(State you now reside in) where I am presently residing. A citizen 20must be a resident of: State ....(Insert time) County ....(Insert time) City, Town or 21Village ....(Insert time), in order to be eligible to register or vote therein. I further 22swear or affirm that my legal residence was established in the State of ....(the State 23where you now reside) on .... Month .... Day .... Year.AB617,6,2424Signed .... Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab617 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab617 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB617 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB617 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB617: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting